Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 4

Adult Day Care

71-2-401. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adult day care” means services provided to five (5) or more adult recipients, for more than three (3) hours per day, by a provider of such services who is not related to such adult, pursuant to an individualized plan of care designed to maintain or restore each adult's optimal capacity for self care through medical or social services;

“Adult day care center” means a facility that provides adult day care services;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of human services;

“Department” means the department of human services; and

“Related” means, for purposes of this part, a person who is related to the adult day care services recipient as a legal or biological parent, spouse, child, sibling, aunt, uncle, nephew or niece of any degree, grandparent or grandchild of any degree, or cousin to the third degree, or a step parent, or a step grandparent of any degree.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 2; 1997, ch. 449, § 1; 2017, ch. 276, § 1.

71-2-402. Licensing requirements — Exemption for
limited respite care services program.

No person or any entity of any kind, public or private, shall provide adult day care in this state without first obtaining a license as provided in this part.

If any person or entity appears to be subject to the licensing requirements of this part and is currently licensed by any other agency of state government, the commissioner shall consult with the head of such other state agency, and, if after such consultation, the commissioner determines that the services to adults that are provided by the person or entity are adequately regulated by the licensing requirements of that other state agency, then the commissioner may determine that no licensing of such person or entity by the department pursuant to this part shall be necessary.

A limited respite care services program is exempt from licensure under this part.

For purposes of this subsection (c), “limited respite care services program” means a program that has as its sole purpose to provide primary caregivers of appropriate adults with relief from normal caregiving duties and responsibilities and:

Is operated by a religious institution or religious organization that provides custodial care for aging adults and adults with limitations on activities of daily living:

Who can function in a group setting;

Who can feed and perform toilet functions without the assistance of a personal aide accompanying them; and

Who attend no more than three (3) days each calendar week, no more than twelve (12) hours in any one (1) week, and no more than six (6) hours in any one (1) day;

Is registered with the department pursuant to rule promulgated by the commissioner under § 71-2-412;

Maintains records that include, at a minimum, dates and times of each adult's attendance;

Provides care services for less than fifteen (15) adults at the same time; and

Does not administer medications to adults while under the program's care.

For purposes of this subsection (c), “religious institution” or “religious organization” means an entity exempt from registration as a bona fide religious institution under § 48-101-502.

The department is authorized to make site visits to a program in order to ensure compliance with the terms of the exemption permitted under this subsection (c).

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 3; 2018, ch. 607, § 1.

71-2-403. Review of records and registries — Verification — Exclusion from access to adults.

A review of the records and registries set forth in subdivisions (a)(1)-(6) shall be conducted for all new employees or for volunteers who are counted in the staff/adult participant ratio and those volunteers who have unsupervised access to the adult participants in adult day care centers, and for all new department licensing staff who regulate the adult day care licensing program and all new counselors and supervisors providing services in the adult protective services program:

Criminal background history;

Juvenile records history available to the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI);

Any available juvenile court records, if determined necessary by the department;

Vulnerable persons registry pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, part 10;

State's sex offender registry; and

Records of indicated perpetrators of abuse or neglect of children or adults maintained by the department of children's services and the department of human services.

Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision (b)(1) and in subsections (c) and (e), and except where the context or intent would otherwise render the language inapplicable to the persons having access to adults in an adult day care center, the procedures, requirements and any other statutory provisions involving the requirements for disclosure forms, the methodology for obtaining and reporting the fingerprint-based criminal and available juvenile histories of a person, the exclusions of persons with a prohibited records history, the appeals processes, the department's authority to allow by rule of the department for exemptions from a verified prohibited history, permissive review procedures and any other consistent procedures, shall be the same for persons subject to this section as those provided in § 71-3-507 for persons having access to children in childcare agencies licensed by the department of human services pursuant to chapter 3, part 5 of this title; provided, that the adult day care center, and not the department, shall be responsible for all of the costs of the fingerprint background checks conducted by the TBI and the federal bureau of investigation for its employees or volunteers subject to this section.

With respect to volunteers, this section applies only to those volunteers who serve as volunteers for more than thirty-six (36) hours in any one (1) calendar year.

The adult day care center may require that the costs of the background check be a part of the application process by a prospective employee or volunteer, or it may pay the costs and recover the costs of the fingerprint-based background checks from the prospective employee following employment. The department shall pay all costs required for its employees subject to the required background reviews.

The TBI shall make any reports of positive matches pursuant to this section in the same manner as provided for any of the processes authorized by § 71-3-507.

Conviction by a criminal court or adjudication by the juvenile court for an offense or a lesser included offense involving the physical, sexual or emotional abuse, neglect, financial exploitation or misuse of funds or theft from any person, or that constitutes conviction or adjudication for an offense involving violence against any person, or conviction of an offense involving the manufacture, sale, possession or distribution of any drug, or a no-contest plea to such offenses, and any pending warrants, indictments, presentments or petitions for such offenses, or the identification of any person on the department of health's vulnerable persons registry pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, part 10, on the state's sex offender registry or identification as a perpetrator of abuse or neglect of children or adults in the records of the department of children's services or department of human services as provided in § 71-3-515 shall disqualify such person from employment with, or from having any access whatsoever to adults in, an adult day care center as defined by this part, and from employment with the department as regulatory staff in the department's adult day care licensing program and service staff in the adult protective services program.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 4; 1997, ch. 449, § 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 69; 2009, ch. 410, § 1; 2013, ch. 101, § 1.

71-2-404. Profits — Application requirements.

If an adult day care center is operated only by a municipality or county or by a nonprofit corporation, no part of the net earnings may lawfully inure to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. An applicant for initial licensure as an adult day care center shall file with the department, pursuant to its regulations, an application on forms furnished by the department, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Evidence satisfactory to the department that the applicant, its directors and officers, if the applicant is a nonprofit corporation, and the person designated to manage the day to day affairs of the proposed adult day care center are of reputable and responsible character;

Evidence satisfactory to the department of the ability of the applicant to comply with this part and of rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this part by the department;

Such other information as may be required by the department for the proper administration and enforcement of this part.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 5.

71-2-405. Licensing procedures — Fees — Biennial licenses — Transfers of licenses.

An application for a license shall be submitted to the department in such manner as the department may require.

An application for a license shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee for the license and shall be received by the department not less than thirty (30) days prior to the expiration date of the existing license. Failure to timely submit a renewal application for a license shall result in expiration of the existing license.

Each application submitted to the department for a new license or for the renewal of a license shall be accompanied by the fee required for the license.

The commissioner may approve applications for renewal of a license as a biennial or triennial licensee if the commissioner determines that the applicant's methods of care and history of compliance clearly demonstrate that a biennial or triennial license is warranted.

The fees for adult day care centers shall be:

Annual Fee $ 125Biennial Fee $ 175Triennial Fee $ 200

Annual Fee $ 200Biennial Fee $ 250Triennial Fee $ 300

Centers caring for less than twenty (20) participants:

Centers caring for twenty (20) to one hundred (100) participants:

Centers caring for more than one hundred (100) participants:

Annual Fee $ 400Biennial Fee $ 450Triennial Fee $ 500

The fees shall be earmarked and dedicated to the department for the improvement of the quality of adult services in this state.

If the department issues a temporary license after the application fee is paid, no further fee shall be required until the adult day care center applies again for an annual license or for renewal of the regular annual, biennial or triennial license.

Any adult day care center that is operated by a public, nonprofit agency or local municipality operating under a grant from the department and that pays an administrative fee as part of the monitoring requirements of such grant shall be exempt from the licensing fee.

If the department determines that the applicant for annual license does not meet all of the requirements for such license, but has presented satisfactory evidence that the facility that is proposed for the care of adults has received fire safety, environmental safety and any necessary food establishment approval, that the applicant and the personnel who will care for the adults are capable in substantially all respects to care for the adults and that the applicant has the ability and intent to comply with the licensing law and regulations, the department may issue a temporary license to the applicant.

The purpose of the temporary license is to permit the license applicant to demonstrate to the department that the applicant has complied with all licensing laws and regulations applicable prior to the issuance of an initial annual license.

Within six (6) months of the issuance of the temporary license, the department shall determine if the applicant has complied with all regulations governing the adult day care centers. The department may extend the period of the temporary license for an additional six (6) months if the department determines that the applicant has made substantial progress in meeting the requirements of the law and regulations for an initial annual license.

If the department determines that the applicant for any license complies with all licensing laws and regulations for adult day care centers, the department shall issue an annual, biennial or triennial license. The department may issue a restricted license as provided in § 71-2-407 if circumstances warrant. If the applicant has not complied with such laws or regulations or if circumstances do not warrant the issuance of a restricted license, the application shall be denied.

A biennial or triennial license may not be granted as the first license immediately following any temporary license. If a biennial or triennial license is granted, the commissioner may limit the biennial or triennial license to an annual or biennial or triennial license at the next renewal period, or may at any time reduce the biennial or triennial licensure period to a shorter period. Such reduction in the licensing period may be appealed pursuant to the procedures for appeal of license denials or revocations.

The annual, biennial or triennial license shall expire, respectively, twelve (12), twenty-four (24) or thirty-six (36) months from the date of its issuance unless the licensee has made timely reapplication for renewal and the department has not determined the status of the application, in which case the existing license shall continue in effect, unless suspended, until such determination is made and until a timely filed appeal is resolved by entry of a final order regarding the license application pursuant to § 4-5-314.

Each license issued or renewed pursuant to this part shall not be transferable to any other person or entity, and the sale, or transfer of the adult day care facility by any means, from the person or entity that is named as the licensee to any other person or entity shall void the existing license or any pending appeal of the denial or revocation of the existing license, and shall require an application by the transferee for an annual license and the payment of the required licensing fee. The adult day care center, the ownership or control of which has been transferred by the existing licensee, may not continue operation until a temporary or annual license is granted to the transferee. The new licensee in such circumstances may not be the transferor or any person or entity acting on behalf of the transferor.

If, however, the department determines that any person or entity has transferred nominal control of a center to any persons or entities who are determined by the department to be acting on behalf of the purported transferor in order to circumvent a history of violations of the licensing law or regulations or to otherwise attempt to circumvent the licensing law or regulations or any prior licensing actions instituted by the department, the department may deny the issuance of any license to the applicant. The denial of the license may be appealed as provided in § 71-2-408.

The license of any center shall not be voided nor shall any pending appeal be voided pursuant to this subsection (c) solely for the reason that the center is subject to judicial orders directing the transfer of control or management of an adult day care center or its license to any receiver, trustee, administrator or executor of an estate, or any similarly situated person or entity.

If the current licensee dies, and provided that no licensing violations require the suspension, denial or revocation of the agency's license, the department may grant family members of the licensee, or administrators or executors of the licensee, a temporary license to continue operation for a period of six (6) months. At the end of such period, the department shall determine whether an annual or extended license should be granted to a new licensee as otherwise provided in this section.

Nothing in this subsection (c) shall be construed to prevent the department from taking any regulatory or judicial action as may be required pursuant to the licensing laws and regulations that may be necessary to protect the adults in the care of such center.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 6; 1997, ch. 449, §§ 4, 5; 2000, ch. 981, § 70.

71-2-406. Revocation of license.

If, during the period of any license issued by the department, it determines that the license issued to the adult day care center should be revoked because of a failure to comply with the standards of this part or the regulations adopted pursuant to this part for the operation of such a center, the department may, after notice and an opportunity to show compliance with all lawful requirements for retention of the license, revoke such license upon sixty (60) days' notice to the licensee or other person responsible for the day to day operation of the adult day care center.

A license may be summarily suspended by the department if, pursuant to § 4-5-320, the department finds in its summary suspension order that the public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, and that the order states what action must be taken by the licensee to immediately effect compliance with the licensing standards.

The summary suspension order shall be reviewed by a hearing officer appointed by the commissioner within five (5) working days of the suspension order, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, who shall make a written determination of whether probable cause exists for continuance of the suspension order after opportunity for response and an informal hearing before such officer by the licensee.

The department shall adopt such other rules as may be necessary to provide due process procedures involving the licensing of adult day care centers that are consistent with law, and to accomplish the revocation, denial and suspension of license procedures as may be required by this part.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 7.

71-2-407. Restricted licenses.

In determining whether to deny, revoke or suspend a license, or in granting any license, the department may choose to deny, revoke or suspend or grant only certain authority of the licensee to operate and may permit the licensee to continue operation, but may restrict or modify the licensee's authority to provide certain services or perform certain functions, including, but not limited to: transportation or food service, enrollment of adult participants at the center, the center's hours of operation, the center's use of certain parts of the center's physical facilities or any other function of the adult day care center that the department determines should be restricted or modified to protect the health, safety or welfare of the adult participants. The actions authorized by this subdivision (a) may be appealed as otherwise provided in this part for any denial or revocation.

At any hearing on a denial, revocation or suspension, the administrative law judge or hearing officer may, as part of the decision regarding the status of the applicant's or licensee's license, direct that the adult day care center be allowed to operate on a probationary or conditional status, or may allow the license to remain in effect with any restrictions or conditions on the center's authority to provide care.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 8; 2000, ch. 981, § 71.

71-2-408. Notification of denial — Hearings.

Immediately upon the denial of any application for issuance or renewal of a license or upon the revocation of any license, the department shall notify the applicant in writing. Not later than ten (10) days after the department mails the notice, the applicant may submit a written petition for a hearing to the department. Upon receipt by the department of the petition in proper form, such petition shall be set for hearing. The hearing shall be held within sixty (60) days of receipt of the petition. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, with the department having all the powers granted in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act to ensure:

Compliance with regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter;

Continued demonstrated community need;

Conformity of the program to individual participants' assessed and reassessed needs and interests with particular attention to visual, auditory and equipment needs;

Suitability of program changes to the community and participants served; and

Compliance with any requirements of law or regulations pertaining to fire and safety.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 11; T.C.A., §71-2-410; Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-408 (Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 9; 1997, ch. 449, § 6), concerning application and administrative fees, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72.

Former §7-2-410 was transferred to this location, and reenacted without change, in 2000.

71-2-409. Inspections — Refusal — Probation.

The department may conduct inspections of every licensed facility or suspected adult day care center. The evaluation method adopted by the department shall be published and distributed to each licensed adult day care center and any other interested person.

Any duly authorized officer, employee or agent of the department may, upon presentation of proper identification, enter and inspect any place providing adult day care at any time, with or without advance notice, to secure compliance with, or to prevent a violation of, any provision of this part or any regulation adopted under this part. If refused entrance for inspection of a licensed or suspected adult day care center, the chancery or circuit court of the county where the licensed or suspected adult day care center is located may issue an immediate ex parte order permitting the department's inspection upon a showing of probable cause and the court may direct any law enforcement officer to aid the department in executing such order and inspection. Refusal to obey such order may be punished as contempt.

If, during the licensing period, the department determines that an adult day care center is not in compliance with the laws or regulations governing its operation, the department may place the adult day care center on probation for a definite period of not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days as determined by the department, and the department shall require the posting by the center of the notice of probation. The department shall provide the center a written basis describing the violation of the licensing rules that support the basis for the probationary status.

If placed on probation, the center shall immediately post a copy of the probation notice, together with a list provided by the department of the violations that were the basis for the probation, in a conspicuous place as directed by the department and with the center's license, and the center shall immediately notify in writing the responsible adult day care participant and the responsible relative or caretaker of each of the adults in its care of the center's status, the basis for the probation and of the center's right to an informal review of the probationary status.

If the center requests an informal review within two (2) business days of the imposition of probation, either verbally or in writing to the department's licensing staff that imposed the probation, the department shall informally review the probationary status by a departmental staff person who was not involved in the decision to impose the probation. The center may submit any written or oral statements as argument to the departmental staff person within five (5) business days of the imposition of the probation. Written and oral statements may be received by any available electronic means. The departmental staff person shall render a decision in writing upholding, modifying or lifting the probationary status within ten (10) business days of the imposition of the probation.

If the departmental staff person does not lift the probation under subdivision (c)(2)(B), the center may also appeal such action in writing to the commissioner within five (5) business days of the receipt of the notice of the departmental staff person's decision regarding the center's probationary status as determined in subdivision (c)(2)(B). If timely appealed, the department shall conduct an administrative hearing pursuant to the contested case provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, concerning the department's action within fifteen (15) business days of receipt of the appeal and shall render a decision in writing within seven (7) business days following conclusion of the hearing. The hearing officer may uphold, modify or lift the probation.

This subsection (c) shall be discretionary with the department, and shall not be a prerequisite to any licensing action, to suspend, deny or revoke a license of an adult day care center.

The department shall make available to all interested persons a list of all licensed adult day care centers and the services that each facility provides. Reports on the results of each inspection, evaluation or consultation performed pursuant to this section shall be kept on file in the department, and all inspection reports, consultation reports, lists of deficiencies and plans of correction shall be open to public inspection during regular business hours.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 12; T.C.A., §71-2-411; Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72; 2001, ch. 453, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-409 (Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 10), concerning the transfer and renewal of a license, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72.

Former §71-2-411 was transferred with amendments to subsection (c) to this location in 2000.

71-2-410. Governing boards.

The department shall require each adult day care center operated by a municipality or county or by a nonprofit corporation and caring for ten (10) or more persons to have a governing board. The governing board of an adult day care center, having final authority and responsibility for conduct of the center, shall be comprised of four (4) or more persons. The governing board may include members who may be recipients of the services of the adult day care center, relatives of such recipients, or representatives of community organizations with particular interest in programs for the elderly. No member of the governing board, nor any member of the immediate family of a member of the governing board, shall have any direct or indirect interest in any contract for supplying services to the adult day care center.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 13; 1997, ch. 449, § 3; T.C.A. §71-2-412; Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-410 was transferred to §71-2-408 in 2000.

Former §71-2-412 was transferred to this location, and reenacted without change, in 2000.

71-2-411. Compliance.

Each adult day care center that files an affidavit with the department as of January 1, 1997, certifying that such facility is in existence and in operation shall have two (2) years to fully comply with this part.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 14; T.C.A., §71-2-413; Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-411 was transferred to §71-2-409 in 2000.

Former §71-2-413 was transferred to this location, and reenacted without change, in 2000.

71-2-412. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this part. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

All rules and regulations promulgated to effectuate the purposes of this part shall also be reviewed by the health and welfare committee of the senate and the health committee of the house of representatives.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner shall have the authority to amend the rules for licensure of adult day care by entities contracted to provide medicaid-reimbursed home- and community-based services pursuant to chapter 5, part 14 of this title, as needed to be consistent with the home- and community-based settings final rule, published in the Federal Register at 79 FR 2947 (January 16, 2014), including the authority to differentiate licensure requirements for any entity contracted to provide medicaid-reimbursed home- and community-based services pursuant to chapter 5, part 14 of this title, in order to allow the facility or entity to comply with the federal rule and continue to receive medicaid reimbursement for home- and community-based services. Rules adopted by the department under this subsection (c) shall be developed with input from stakeholders and promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act; provided, however, that the department shall not promulgate emergency rules under this subsection (c) as defined in § 4-5-208. Licensure survey and enforcement shall be conducted in a manner consistent with any rule issued under this subsection (c).

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 15; T.C.A., §71-2-414; Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72; 2013, ch. 236, § 59; 2015, ch. 153, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-412 was transferred to §71-2-410 in 2000.

Former §71-2-414 was transferred to this location, and reenacted without change, in 2000.

71-2-413. Advisory committee.

There is hereby established an advisory committee consisting of not less than seven (7) members appointed by the commissioner. The advisory committee shall assist the commissioner in implementing this part. The advisory committee shall reflect the diversity of this state with respect to urban and rural areas, the three (3) grand divisions and the various ethnic groups of this state.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 16; T.C.A., §71-2-415; Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-413 was transferred to §71-2-411 in 2000.

Former §71-2-415 was transferred to this location, and reenacted without change, in 2000.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

71-2-414. Implementation.

It is the intent of the general assembly that this part, with the exception of the employment of one (1) employee to assist in the implementation of this part, be implemented within the existing resources of the department.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 20; T.C.A., §71-2-416; Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-414 was transferred to §71-2-412 in 2000.

Former §71-2-416 was transferred to this location, and reenacted without change, in 2000.

71-2-415. Construction.

This part is declared to be remedial in nature and this part shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Acts 1996, ch. 1058, § 19; T.C.A. §71-2-417; Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-415 was transferred to §71-2-413 in 2000.

Former §71-2-417 was transferred to this location, and reenacted without change, in 2000.

71-2-416. Adult day care and senior centers as model programs.

The department of finance and administration shall designate up to five (5) publicly or privately supported adult day care centers or senior centers within the state as model programs worthy of emulation with respect to one (1) or more of the following activities:

Comprehensive health education programs;

Nutrition assessment and screening;

Nutrition counseling; or

Health or nutrition referral services.

The selected model programs shall be programs that are designed to enhance the dignity and wellness of senior citizens and to encourage the independence and involvement of senior citizens in the community. The selected model programs must also be designed to achieve a tangible impact in areas that are traditionally socially and economically underserved.

Prior to designating the model programs, nominations shall be solicited from across the state. In selecting model programs, due consideration shall be given to the level of community acceptance and support for the programs and to the techniques by which the acceptance and support have been achieved.

Subject to the availability of funding for such purposes as contained within the fiscal year 2007-08 budget of the department of finance and administration, state grants shall be awarded to the model programs selected pursuant to this section. The dollar amount of each grant awarded shall be determined by the commissioner of finance and administration. Payment of any grant to any model program shall be conditional upon the willingness of the chief administrative officer of the program to provide informational and consultative assistance to those agencies of state or local government that may desire to emulate, in whole or in part, the model program. Any grant so received by a publicly supported agency shall be in addition to all other public funds that may be otherwise appropriated to the agency and it is not intended to supplant any other funding resource. Any funds not paid to a model program by June 30, 2008, shall revert to the general fund.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall undertake appropriate activities to publicize the department of finance and administration's activities in implementing this section and to publicize the activities and achievements of the model programs.

Acts 2007, ch. 573, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Subsection (d) provides that state grants shall be awarded to the model programs selected pursuant to this section subject to the availability of funding being provided in the general appropriations act. Funding was provided by Acts 2007, ch. 603, § 12, item 7.

Former §71-2-416, concerning implementation, was transferred to §71-2-414 in 2000.